sbl/ukrainian_utf8.sbl
stringescapes {}

/* NOTE: This is not a correct Snowball file. It is ukrainian.sbl with all
 * replacements strings like "{zh}" replaced by actual characters like "ж"
 * for ease of human reading.
 */

routines (
  prelude
  mark_regions R2
  min_len
  short_word_4l
  short_word_5l
  long_word
  perfective_gerund
  reflexive
  long_endings
  adjective
  adjectival
  verb
  noun
  remove_last_letter
  remove_last_2_letters
  remove_last_2_vowels
  remove_vowel_before_vowel
  remove_last_vowel
  derivational
  tidy_up
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p2 )

groupings ( v )

define v 'аеєиіїоуюя'

define prelude as (
  do repeat ( goto (['ґ']) <- 'г' )

  // Remove any apostrophe-like symbols
  do repeat ( goto (['{'}']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['ʹ']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['ʻ']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['ʼ']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['ʽ']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['ˈ']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['‘']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['’']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['‛']) delete )
  do repeat ( goto (['′']) delete )
)

define mark_regions as (
  $pV = limit
  $p2 = limit
  do (
    gopast v   setmark pV     gopast non-v
    gopast v   gopast non-v   setmark p2
  )
)

backwardmode (
  define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

  define perfective_gerund as (
    [substring] among (
      'вши'   // написа|вши
      'вшись'
      'вшися'
      'учи'
      'ючи'
      'ючись'
      'ючися'
      'ачи'
      'ачись'
      'ачися'
      'лячи'
      'лячись'
      'лячися'
      'ячи'
      'ячись'
      'ячися'
        (delete)
   )
  )

  define reflexive as (
    [substring] among (
      'ється' // смі|ється
      'еться'
      'ся'
      'сь'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define long_endings as (
    [substring] among (
      // nouns
      'ість' 'істю' 'істи' 'істе' 'істського'
      'енами'
      'очки' 'очці' 'очку' 'очкою' 'очка'
      'очко' 'очок' 'очкам' 'очками' 'очках'
      'ості' 'ости' 'осте' 'остей' 'остям' 'остями' 'остях'
      'ником' 'никові' 'нику' 'ників' 'ника' 'никам' 'никами' 'никах' 'ники' // need to remove ?
      // 'ніком' 'нікові' 'ніку' 'ніків' 'ніка' 'нікам' 'ніками' 'ніках' 'ніки' // need to remove ?
      'ців' 'цями'
      'ків'

      // female gender
      'кою' 'кам' 'ками' 'ках'
      'ською' 'ська' 'ську' 'сько'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define adjective as (
    [substring] among (
      'ий' 'ого' 'ому' 'им' 'ім'                 // зел|ен.ий
      'іший' 'ішого' 'ішому' 'ішим' 'ішім' 'іше' 'іш'
      'ої' 'ій' 'ою'
      'іша' 'ішої' 'ішій' 'ішу' 'ішою'
      'их' 'ими'
      'ний' 'на' 'не' 'ним' 'нім' 'ної' 'ну' 'ною' 'ній'  'них' 'ні' 'ник' 'но' 'ного' 'ними' 'ному'
      'іші' 'іших' 'ішими'
      'ього' 'ьому'
      'ьої' 'ьою'
      'іх' 'іми'
      'ова' 'ове' 'во'
      'їй' 'иїй'
      'йому' 'ийому'
      'єє' 'еє'
      'ен' 'ена' 'ені' 'ене' 'ену' 'енам' 'ени' 'енів' 'еном'
      'яча' 'яче' 'ячу' 'ячі'
      'ача' 'аче' 'ачу' 'ачі'
      'юча' 'юче' 'ючу' 'ючі'
      'уча' 'уче' 'учу' 'учі'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define adjectival as (
    adjective

    try (
      [substring] among (
        'ен' // зел|ен.ий
        'ов' // абетк|ов.ого
        'яч'
        'ач'
        'юч'
        'уч'
        (delete)
      )
    )
  )

  define verb as (
    [substring] among (
      'ав' 'али' 'ало' 'ала' 'ать' 'ати' // пізнав|ав
      'іть'
      'йте' 'ймо'
      'ме'
      'ла' 'ло' 'ли' 'лу'
      'но'
      //'ти' 'ть' 'те' // need to remove ?
      'єш' 'ємо' 'єте' 'ють'
      'еш' 'емо' 'ете' 'уть'
      'лю' 'иш' 'ить' 'имо' 'ите' 'лять' 'ши'
      'ляти'
      'їш' 'їть' 'їмо' 'їте' 'ять' 'яти'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define noun as (
    [substring] among (
      'ам' 'ами' 'ах' // вод|ам
      'ар' 'арем' 'аря'
      'ею'
      'ям' 'ями' 'ях'
      'ові' 'ом'
      'ець' 'ем'
      'ень'
      'ой'
      'ію' 'ії'
      'ів'
      'ев' 'ов' 'ей' 'иям' 'иях' 'ию'
      'іям' 'іях' 'ія'
      'ия' 'єю' 'еві' 'єм' 'еїв' 'їв'
      'ією' 'иєю' 'еєю'
      'ка' 'ки' 'ці' 'ку' 'ко' 'ок' // female gender
      'ьї' 'ьє' 'ьєю' 'ью' 'ья'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define remove_last_letter as (
    [substring] among (
      'а' 'в' 'е' 'є' 'и' 'і' 'ї' // NOUN: вод|а, VERB: вчи|в
      'й' 'о' 'у' 'ь' 'ю' 'я'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define remove_last_2_letters as ( // 2-letters from the all previous sets
    [substring] among (
      'ав' 'ам' 'ар' 'ах' 'ач'
      'ев' 'еє' 'ей' 'ем' 'ен' 'еш' 'ею'
      'єє' 'єм' 'єш' 'єю'
      'ий' 'им' 'их' 'иш' 'ию' 'ия'
      'ів' 'їв' 'ії' 'ій' 'їй' 'ім' 'іх' 'ію'
      'їш'
      'ла' 'ли' 'ло' 'лю' // аку|лі ?
      'ме' // дія|ми ?
      'ов' 'ої' 'ой' 'ом' 'ою' 'сь' 'ся'
       //'ти' 'те' 'ть' // need to remove ?
      'уч'
      'ьє' 'ьї' 'ью' 'ья'
      'юч'
      'ям' 'ях' 'яч'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define remove_last_vowel as (
    [substring] among (
      'а' 'е' 'є' 'и' 'і' 'ї'
      'й' 'о' 'у' 'ь' 'ю' 'я'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define remove_last_2_vowels as (
    remove_vowel_before_vowel
      and remove_last_vowel
  )

  define remove_vowel_before_vowel as (
    [substring] among (
      'а' 'е' 'є' 'и' 'і' 'ї' 'й' 'о' 'у' 'ь' 'ю' 'я'
      ('а' or 'е' or 'є' or 'и' or 'і' or 'ї' or 'й' or 'о' or 'у' or 'ь' or 'ю' or 'я' delete )
    )
  )

  define derivational as (
    [substring] R2 among (
      'іст' // незалежн|іст.тю
      'ост'
      'ень' 'еньк'
      'ськ'
      'ізм'
        (delete)
    )
  )

  define tidy_up as (
    [substring] among (
      'б' ('б' delete) // хоб|б.і
      'в' ('в' delete)
      'г' ('г' delete)
      'д' ('д' delete) // усевлад|д.ям
      'ж' ('ж' delete)
      'з' ('з' delete)
      'к' ('к' delete)
      'л' ('л' delete)
      'м' ('м' delete)
      'н' ('н' delete)
      'п' ('п' delete)
      'р' ('р' delete)
      'с' ('с' delete)
      'т' ('т' delete)
      'ф' ('ф' delete)
      'ц' ('ц' delete)
      'ч' ('ч' delete)
      'ш' ('ш' delete)
    )
  )

  define min_len as (
    $(len >= 4)
  )

  define short_word_4l as (
    $(len == 4) and (remove_last_2_vowels or remove_last_vowel)
  )

  define short_word_5l as (
    $(len == 5) and (
      remove_last_2_vowels
        or remove_last_vowel
        or remove_last_2_letters
    ) or
      $(len == 5) and do remove_last_vowel
  )

  define long_word as (
    $(len > 5) and do (
      do (
        perfective_gerund or (
          try reflexive

          long_endings or adjectival or verb or noun or remove_last_letter
        )
      )

      do derivational
      do remove_last_2_vowels
      do remove_last_vowel
    )
  )
)

define stem as (
  do prelude
  do mark_regions

  backwards setlimit tomark pV for (
    min_len

    short_word_4l or short_word_5l or long_word

    do tidy_up
  )
)
